Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2010.01
Child abuse and neglect; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that child abuse and neglect are community problems requiring immediate and appropriate response by law enforcement and other agencies. It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that all persons responsible for responding to such reports are provided with adequate resources with which to investigate such reports, including appropriate training and access to information sources, particularly in rural areas of the state.

Laws 1996, LB 842, § 1.